Utah statutes.
79-4-901.   Pioneer heritage of Utah -- Acquisitions and operations by
division.
(1)  The division may acquire, construct, maintain, and operate any land
areas, objects, or structures as necessary to preserve, protect, display, and
enhance any gifts and other historical objects or collections donated, loaned,
or otherwise acquired that appropriately contribute to the pioneer heritage of
Utah.
(2)  To accomplish Subsection (1), the division may directly or through
others, by purchase, contract, lease, permit, donation, or otherwise, secure
all real or personal property, rights-of-way, approach roads, parking and
other areas, structures, facilities, and services that the division and board
may consider necessary or desirable to contribute to the pioneer heritage of
Utah.
